fts/tsearch_data/russian.affix
#
#	Russian affix file and dictionaries for ispell
#	Version number: 0.99g3
#
#	Copyright (c) 1997-2006 by Alexander I. Lebedev
#	(swan@scon155.phys.msu.su)
#
# Permission to use, copy, redistribute is granted.  Permission to
# redistribute modifications in patch form is granted.  Permission
# to redistribute binaries made of modified sources is granted.
# All other rights reserved.
#
# The format of ispell dictionaries and affix files is described in
# ispell(4) man page.
#
#	Affix table for Russian
#

nroffchars      ().\\*
texchars        ()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

# First we declare the character set.

# sound
# a	     а  А	ka	     к  К	kha	     х  Х
# be	     б  Б	el	     л  Л	tse	     ц	Ц
# ve	     в  В	em	     м  М	che	     ч	Ч
# ge	     г  Г	en	     н  Н	sha	     ш  Ш
# de	     д  Д	o	     о  О	shcha	     щ  Щ
# e	     е  Е	pe	     п  П	hard sign    ъ  _
# yo         ё  Ё	er	     р  Р	ery	     ы  Ы
# zhe        ж  Ж	es	     с  С	soft sign    ь  Ь
# ze	     з  З	te	     т  Т	reverse ye   э  Э
# ye	     и  И	u	     у  У	yu	     ю  Ю
# short i    й  Й	ef	     ф  Ф	ya	     я  Я

# There are several character sets used for Russian.  Makefile is used
# to activate the desired character set and choose whether the support
# for Russian letter yo is needed.

# koi8-r character set
wordchars [\xc0-\xdf] [\xe0-\xff]
wordchars \xa3 \xb3
#
# iso-8859-5 character set
#iso [\xd0-\xef] [\xb0-\xcf]
#iso \xf1 \xa1
#
# cp866 (alt) character set
#alt [\xa0-\xaf] [\x80-\x8f]
#alt [\xe0-\xef] [\x90-\x9f]
#alt \xf1 \xf0
#
# cp1251 (win) character set
#win [\xe0-\xff] [\xc0-\xdf]
#win \xb8 \xa8
#
# maccyrillic character set
#mac [\xe0-\xfe] [\x80-\x9e]
#mac \xdf \x9f
#mac \xde \xdd

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      **************************
#            AB  EFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Available:   CD                      

#prefixes

suffixes

flag *L:
#
# прошедшее время глаголов
#
    [^ЗС] Т Ь	>	-ТЬ,Л		# брать > брал
    [^С] Т Ь	>	-ТЬ,ЛА		# брать > брала
    [^С] Т Ь	>	-ТЬ,ЛО		# брать > брало
    [^С] Т Ь	>	-ТЬ,ЛИ		# брать > брали
    [^ЗС] Т Ь С Я	>	-ТЬСЯ,ЛСЯ	# браться > брался
    [^С] Т Ь С Я	>	-ТЬСЯ,ЛАСЬ	# браться > бралась
    [^С] Т Ь С Я	>	-ТЬСЯ,ЛОСЬ	# браться > бралось
    [^С] Т Ь С Я	>	-ТЬСЯ,ЛИСЬ	# браться > брались
#
    [^Ч] . С Т Ь	>	-СТЬ,Л		# класть > клал
#y    Ч Е С Т Ь	>	-ЕСТЬ,ЁЛ	# прочесть > прочёл
    Ч Е С Т Ь	>	-ЕСТЬ,ЕЛ	#
    [^Ч] . С Т Ь	>	-СТЬ,ЛА		# класть > клала
    Ч Е С Т Ь	>	-ЕСТЬ,ЛА	# прочесть > прочла
    [^Ч] . С Т Ь	>	-СТЬ,ЛО		# класть > клало
    Ч Е С Т Ь	>	-ЕСТЬ,ЛО	# прочесть > прочло
    [^Ч] . С Т Ь	>	-СТЬ,ЛИ		# класть > клали
    Ч Е С Т Ь	>	-ЕСТЬ,ЛИ	# прочесть > прочли
    С Т Ь С Я	>	-СТЬСЯ,ЛСЯ	# клясться > клялся
    С Т Ь С Я	>	-СТЬСЯ,ЛАСЬ	# клясться > клялась
    С Т Ь С Я	>	-СТЬСЯ,ЛОСЬ	# клясться > клялось
    С Т Ь С Я	>	-СТЬСЯ,ЛИСЬ	# клясться > клялись
#
#y    [^Е] С Т И	>	-СТИ,Л		# блюсти > блюл
#y    Е С Т И	>	-ЕСТИ,ЁЛ	# цвести > цвёл
    С Т И	>	-СТИ,Л		#
    С Т И	>	-СТИ,ЛА		# цвести > цвела
    С Т И	>	-СТИ,ЛО		# цвести > цвело
    С Т И	>	-СТИ,ЛИ		# цвести > цвели
#y    [^Е] С Т И С Ь	>	-СТИСЬ,ЛСЯ	# блюстись > блюлся
#y    Е С Т И С Ь	>	-ЕСТИСЬ,ЁЛСЯ	# плестись > плёлся
    С Т И С Ь	>	-СТИСЬ,ЛСЯ	#
    С Т И С Ь	> 	-СТИСЬ,ЛАСЬ	# плестись > плелась
    С Т И С Ь	>	-СТИСЬ,ЛОСЬ	# плестись > плелось
    С Т И С Ь	>	-СТИСЬ,ЛИСЬ	# плестись > плелись
#
#y    З Т И	>	-ЕЗТИ,ЁЗ	# везти > вёз
    З Т И	>	-ЗТИ,З		#
    З Т И	>	-ТИ,ЛА		# везти > везла
    З Т И	>	-ТИ,ЛИ		# везти > везли
    З Т И	>	-ТИ,ЛО		# везти > везло
# только одна новая форма
    З Т Ь	>	-ЗТЬ,З		# влезть > влез
    З Т Ь С Я	>	-ТЬСЯ,СЯ	# грызться > грызся
# около 60% глаголов на -чь
#y    Е Ч Ь		>	-ЕЧЬ,ЁК		# испечь > испёк
#y    [^Е] Ч Ь		>	-ЧЬ,К		# толочь > толок
    Ч Ь		>	-ЧЬ,К		#
    Ч Ь		>	-ЧЬ,КЛА		# испечь > испекла
    Ч Ь		>	-ЧЬ,КЛО		# испечь > испекло
    Ч Ь		>	-ЧЬ,КЛИ		# испечь > испекли
#y    Е Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЕЧЬСЯ,ЁКСЯ	# испечься > испёкся
#y    [^Е] Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЧЬСЯ,КСЯ	# толочься > толокся
    Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЧЬСЯ,КСЯ	# испечься > испекся
    Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЧЬСЯ,КЛАСЬ	# испечься > испеклась
    Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЧЬСЯ,КЛОСЬ	# испечься > испеклось
    Ч Ь С Я	>	-ЧЬСЯ,КЛИСЬ	# испечься > испеклись
# нестандартное образование окончаний
    [^АИЬЯ]	>	ЛА		# скис > скисла
    [^АИЬЯ]	>	ЛО		# скис > скисло
    [^АИЬЯ]	>	ЛИ		# скис > скисли
    [^АИЬЯ] С Я		>	-СЯ,ЛАСЬ	# затёрся > затёрлась
    [^АИЬЯ] С Я		>	-СЯ,ЛОСЬ	# затёрся > затёрлось
    [^АИЬЯ] С Я		>	-СЯ,ЛИСЬ	# затёрся > затёрлись
# для слов с переменным е-ё (шёл-шла) выделяем два гнезда: м. и ж.р.
    А		>	-А,О		# шла > шло
    А		>	-А,И		# шла > шли
    А С Ь	>	-АСЬ,ОСЬ	# разлеглась > разлеглось
    А С Ь	>	-АСЬ,ИСЬ	# разлеглась > разлеглись
