fts/tsearch_data/russian.dict
адресовать/LQRTU
акцептовать/LQRU
анкетироваться/LQU
арестовываться/L
аффектировать/LU
барабанить/LPTW
безобразить/LW
бичевать/LQTU
блиндировать/LQU
бормотать/LY
бродить/BLPW
будоражить/LPTW
бушевать/LQTU
вбивать/BLMP
ввестись/L
вдавливать/BLMP
вдохновляться/BLPU
веровать/LQTU
вжиматься/BLMP
взбрести/L
взвить/LR
вздрагивать/BLMP
взмахнуть/BLRU
взревывать/LP
видоизменять/BLPU
вкинуть/BLMR
вкручиваться/L
вляпаться/BLMR
вмять/L
водружать/BLMP
возвышать/BLMP
воздеть/LRV
вознесла/L
волынить/LPW
ворожить/BLPW
воспламенить/BLRW
восславляться/L
вошла/L
впихивать/BLMP
впускать/BLMP
вручаться/LP
всклочивать/LMP
вспахиваться/L
вспучить/LRW
встряхнуться/BLRU
втесаться/LRY
втянуться/BLMR
выбирать/BLMP
вывалить/BLRW
вывинчивать/BLMP
выговориться/BLRW
выдвигать/BLMP
выдраиваться/L
выжиматься/BLMP
выкалываться/LP
выклёвывать/LMP
выкопаться/L
выкупиться/BLRW
вылизываться/BLMP
вымараться/LMR
вымокать/BLMP
вынуть/LMRT
выпестовать/LRU
выплеснуться/BLMR
выпроводить/BLRW
выпяливаться/LMP
выровняться/BLRU
высватать/BLMR
высидеть/LRTY
высмаркиваться/BLMP
выстояться/LRTU
высыпать/BLMPRV
вытеснять/BLPU
вытряхиваться/L
выхлестнуться/L
вычерпывать/BLMP
вышибать/BLMP
вякнуть/BLMR
гастролировать/LQTU
глазировать/LQRTU
гнушаться/BLMP
готовить/LPTW
гробить/LPTW
гудеть/LTY
дебютировать/LQRTU
декларировать/LQTU
денатурировать/LQRU
деться/LV
дискриминироваться/L
добиваться/BLMP
довершаться/L
догорать/BLMP
дожёвывать/BLMP
доказать/LRY
документироваться/LQ
доматываться/L
допеть/LR
дополнять/BLPU
дорожить/BLPW
досочинить/BLRW
досылать/BLMP
дох/L
дрессировать/LQTU
душить/BLPW
ёрзать/BLMP
жестикулировать/LQTU
забалансировать/LRU
забинтовываться/LMP
забраковать/LRTU
забутить/LRW
завертываться/BLMP
завис/L
заворожиться/LRW
загибать/BLMP
заговориться/LRW
загребла/L
загулять/BLRU
задерживаться/BLMP
задрёмывать/LMP
заёрзать/BLMR
зазвучать/LRU
заинтересовывать/BLMP
закатить/BLRW
заклеить/LRTW
заколоться/BLMR
закрадываться/LP
закрякать/LMR
залегать/LMP
залосниться/LR
заматываться/BLMP
замечать/BLMP
замочить/BLRW
занавозить/LRW
запаивать/BLMP
запекаться/LP
запихать/BLMR
заползать/BLMP
запрашиваться/L
запруживать/BLMP
запылиться/LRW
зарекомендоваться/LRU
зарывать/BLMP
заседать/BLMP
заскрежетать/LR
засомневаться/LMR
застиг/L
застрять/LR
затаиться/BLRW
затемнять/BLPU
затоварить/LRW
затребовать/LRTU
затыкать/BLMP
захватить/BLRW
заходиться/LPW
зачаровывать/LMP
зачистить/BLRW
зашкаливать/LP
защебетать/LRY
зверствовать/LQTU
знать/BLMP
избег/L
извещаться/LMP
изголодаться/LMR
изжить/LRV
изматываться/LMP
изнасиловать/LTU
изолгаться/LR
изумить/BLRW
иметься/LP
инкассировать/LQU
интерпретироваться/LQ
искорежить/LRTW
испепеляться/L
исправлять/BLPU
истерся/L
истратиться/LRW
исчертить/LRW
канонизировать/LQTU
качаться/BLMP
классифицировать/LQRTU
коверкать/BLMP
колотиться/BLPW
компоновать/LQTU
консультировать/LQTU
копить/BLPW
корячиться/LPTW
крепить/BLPW
крушить/BLPW
курироваться/LQU
лапать/BLMP
лететь/LTY
лобзать/BLMP
лучиться/LP
маклачить/LPW
материализовать/LQTU
мести/L
мириться/BLPW
молоться/L
мошенничать/BLMP
мылиться/LPTW
набрасывать/BLMP
наверстывать/BLMP
навозить/LRW
нагнуться/BLRU
нагружаться/BLMP
надергать/BLMR
надраивать/BLMP
надыбать/LMR
назревать/LP
накатывать/BLMP
наколдовать/LRTU
накрывать/BLMP
наливаться/LMP
намаяться/LRU
намотаться/LMR
напаивать/BLMP
напичкать/BLMR
напортачить/LRTW
напыжиться/LRW
нарушаться/LP
наскребла/L
настаиваться/LP
насупиться/LRTW
натолкать/BLMR
научить/BLRW
нацелить/LRTW
нашёптывать/BLMP
недовешивать/LMP
недосчитаться/LMR
низлагать/LMP
нуллифицировать/LQRU
обвеваться/LMP
обворожить/BLRW
обдуваться/BLMP
обезжириваться/L
обертывать/BLMP
обесцениваться/LP
обидеть/LRY
облагаться/LP
облениться/LRW
облокотить/BLRW
обмельчать/LR
обмыться/BLMR
обнюхаться/BLMR
обожглась/L
оборонить/LRW
обрадоваться/LRTU
обривать/BLMP
обсаживать/LMP
обстругать/BLMR
обтрепаться/LRV
обучиться/BLRW
объездить/BLRW
овеществиться/LR
оголить/BLRW
одаривать/BLMP
одряхлеть/LMR
ожиреть/LMR
озлобляться/BLPU
окапывать/BLMP
околдовывать/LMP
окропить/BLRW
окуривать/BLMP
онемечивать/LMP
опешить/LRW
оплёвываться/L
опомниться/BLRW
опрашивать/BLMP
опрыскиваться/BLMP
организовать/LQRTU
осветиться/LR
осип/L
ослепить/BLRW
оснежить/LRW
остепенять/LPU
остыть/LR
отбиваться/BLMP
отбыть/LRY
ответвлять/LPU
отворачиваться/BLMP
отграничивать/LMP
отделываться/BLMP
отжевать/LRTV
откашливаться/BLMP
отключиться/BLRW
откочёвывать/LM
откусывать/BLMP
отложиться/LRW
отмер/L
отмяк/L
отодвинуться/LMRT
отпахать/LRY
отплевывать/BLMP
отпрянуть/LMRT
отрезветь/LMR
отрыгивать/BLMP
отсигналить/LRW
отсрочивать/BLMP
отстриг/L
оттаскивать/BLMP
отторгаться/LMP
отхватить/BLRW
отчисляться/BLPU
отштамповать/LRTU
отягчать/BLMP
охмурить/LRW
очерняться/L
ошпариться/BLRW
паразитировать/LQTU
пасынковать/LQRU
переаттестовывать/LMP
перебраниваться/BLMP
перевербовать/LRTU
перевираться/L
перевыбирать/LMP
перегореть/LRTY
передвинуть/LMRT
передумать/BLMR
перезагружаться/LP
переизбираться/LP
переквалифицировать/LQRTU
перекодироваться/L
перекроить/BLRW
перелетать/BLMP
переманивать/BLMP
перемигнуться/BLRU
перенастроить/LRTW
переопределить/BLRW
перепачкаться/BLMR
переплестись/LY
перепродавать/BLPU
перерешить/BLRW
переселить/BLRW
пересортировать/LRU
перестраховаться/LRTU
перетащить/BLRW
перехватиться/LRW
петлять/BLPU
плестись/LY
побояться/LRTU
повёртывать/BLMP
повыходить/BLRW
погрузиться/BLRW
подвинуть/LMRT
поддразнить/BLRW
подкачивать/BLMP
подливать/BLMP
подниматься/BLMP
подпихивать/BLMP
подрываться/BLMP
подстилаться/L
подтрунивать/BLMP
подыскаться/L
поздравить/LRTW
покивать/BLMR
покрыться/BLMR
полопаться/LMR
помечать/BLMP
помянуть/BLMR
поотбивать/LMR
попотчевать/LRTU
поразмышлять/BLRU
посвататься/BLMR
посмуглеть/LMR
постулировать/LQRTU
потормошить/BLRW
поучать/BLMP
почитывать/BLMP
превалировать/LQTU
предполагать/BLMP
прельщаться/BLMP
преуменьшать/BLMP
привиться/LR
приготавливаться/BLMP
признать/BLMR
прикручивать/BLMP
примериваться/BLMP
принюхаться/BLMR
приписывать/BLMP
приручаться/LMP
пристегиваться/BLMP
притиснуть/BLMR
прихваливать/LMP
пришиваться/L
пробраться/LRY
провисеть/LRTY
проголодаться/BLMR
продёргивать/BLMP
прожектерствовать/LQTU
прокармливать/LMP
прокрашиваться/L
промёрз/L
пропасть/LRY
прореживать/BLMP
проскальзывать/BLMP
простоять/LRTU
противопоставляться/BLPU
прохлопать/LMR
прошуршать/LRU
пытаться/BLMP
разбухать/LMP
разволновать/LRTU
разгружать/BLMP
раздумать/BLMR
разлучиться/LRW
размыкаться/LP
разоружиться/BLRW
разувать/BLMP
раскапываться/L
расколотить/BLRW
раскусывать/LMP
распить/LR
распределить/BLRW
рассевать/LMP
рассредотачивать/LMP
растачиваться/L
растрепать/LRV
расцветить/BLRW
расшифровываться/LP
резюмировать/LQTU
роднить/LPW
сагитировать/LRTU
сблизиться/LRTW
свершать/LMP
сглазить/LRTW
сдрейфить/LRW
сиживать/LP
скитаться/BLMP
скопляться/LP
славить/LPTW
слышать/LU
сминать/LMP
снеслась/L
согласиться/BLRW
солировать/LQU
соскоблить/BLRW
сочиняться/L
спланировать/LRTU
спрягать/BLMP
ссорить/LPTW
стесняться/BLPU
стригся/L
сумерничать/LMP
счищать/BLMP
татуироваться/LU
тлеть/BLMP
транспонировать/LQU
тупить/BLPW
убыстрить/BLRW
уволить/LRTW
удаться/L
уединить/LRW
укорачивать/BLMP
уложиться/BLRW
уморить/BLRW
уплетать/BLMP
упускать/BLMP
усластить/LRW
устранить/BLRW
утилизироваться/L
ухитриться/BLRW
уязвлять/BLPU
фосфоресцировать/LQ
хлопотать/LY
царствовать/LQTU
чиниться/BLPW
шевельнуть/BLRU
штабелевать/LQU
экспатриировать/LU
